Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1811.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 705(a) of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 705. Price paid for acquisitions and improvements.(a) Game lands.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph [(2)] (3), the commission may pay for lands to be used as game lands what it considers a fair and reasonable price [not to exceed $400 per acre] exclusive of Federal and other cost-sharing funds and consistent with the market value of land in the locality in which the game land is located.[(2) The commission may pay for lands to be used as game lands in a county of the second class what it considers a fair and reasonable price exclusive of Federal and other 123456789101112131415161718 cost-sharing funds and consistent with the market value of land in the locality in which the game land is located.](3) For lands to be used as game lands in a county of the sixth, seventh or eighth class, the fair and reasonable price described in paragraph (1) may not exceed $400 per acre.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1811PN2226 - 2 - 12345678